Washington statutes.
RCW 18.11.160

License—Prohibition on issuance—Disciplinary action—License suspension.

(1) Except as provided in RCW 9.97.020, no license shall be issued by the department to any person who has been convicted of forgery, embezzlement, obtaining money under false pretenses, extortion, criminal conspiracy, fraud, theft, receiving stolen goods, unlawful issuance of checks or drafts, or other similar offense, or to any partnership of which the person is a member, or to any association or corporation of which the person is an officer or in which as a stockholder the person has or exercises a controlling interest either directly or indirectly.

(2) In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW 18.235.130, the director has the authority to take disciplinary action for any of the following conduct, acts, or conditions:

(a) Underreporting to the department of sales figures so that the auctioneer or auction company surety bond is in a lower amount than required by law;

(b) Nonpayment of an administrative fine prior to renewal of a license; and

(c) Any other violations of this chapter.

(3) The department shall immediately suspend the license of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license shall be automatic upon the department's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

[ 2016 c 81 s 8; 2002 c 86 s 209; 1997 c 58 s 814; 1986 c 324 s 12; 1982 c 205 s 14.]

NOTES:

Finding—Conflict with federal requirements—2016 c 81: See notes following RCW 9.97.010.

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.